Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-307
Alcohol or drug disorder, defined.

Alcohol or drug disorder means a substance-related disorder as defined by the department in rules and regulations substantially similar with the definitions of the American Psychiatric Association in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 158.